Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB24.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 65A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "County" means any county, consolidated local government, urban-county government, unified local
government, or charter county;
(2) "DLG" means the Department for Local Government established by KRS 147A.002;
(3) "Establishing entity" means the city or county, or any combination of cities and counties, that established a
special purpose governmental entity and that has not subsequently withdrawn its affiliation with the special
purpose governmental entity by ordinance or other official action;
(4) "Federally regulated municipal utility" means a municipal utility governed by the provisions of KRS 96.550 to
96.901, that maintains a wholesale power contract with a federal agency that also serves as its regulatory
authority;
(5) (a) "Fee" means any user charge, levy, assessment, fee, schedule of rates, or tax, other than an ad valorem
tax, imposed by a special purpose governmental entity.
(b) "Fee" shall not include the following charges imposed by special purpose governmental entities that
provide utility services:
1. Any fuel cost adjustment that is:
a. Made pursuant to an agreement with a power supplier;
b. Amended by the power supplier based on the variable cost of fuel; and
c. Passed through to the consumer by the utility pursuant to the agreement between the
utility and the power supplier;
2. Any power or energy cost adjustment implemented pursuant to a duly adopted base rate that
provides for the periodic adjustment of a component of the rate, including any fuel costs or
transmission costs, in accordance with the formula or conditions set forth in the base rate; or
3. Any environmental control cost adjustments or surcharges implemented pursuant to a duly
adopted base rate that provides for the periodic adjustment of a component of the rate in
accordance with a formula or conditions set forth in the base rate;
(6) (a) "Private entity" means any entity whose sole source of public funds is from payments pursuant to a
contract with a city, county, or special purpose governmental entity, including funds received as a grant
or as a result of a competitively bid procurement process.
(b) "Private entity" does not include any entity:
1. Created, wholly or in part, by a city, county, or combination of cities and counties to perform one
(1) or more of the types of public services listed in subsection (9)(c) of this section; or
2. Governed by a board, council, commission, committee, authority, or corporation with any
member or members who are appointed by the chief executive or governing body of a city,
county, or combination of cities and counties, or whose voting membership includes
governmental officials who serve in an ex officio capacity;
(7) "Public funds" means any funds derived from the levy of a tax, fee, assessment, or charge, or the issuance of
bonds by the state or a city, county, or special purpose governmental entity;
(8) "Registry" means the online central registry and reporting portal established pursuant to KRS 65A.020; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(9) (a) "Special purpose governmental entity" or "entity" means any agency, authority, or entity created or
authorized by statute which:
1. Exercises less than statewide jurisdiction;
2. Exists for the purpose of providing one (1) or a limited number of services or functions;
3. Is governed by a board, council, commission, committee, authority, or corporation with policy-
making authority that is separate from the state and the governing body of the city, county, or
cities and counties in which it operates; and
4. a. Has the independent authority to generate public funds; or
b. May receive and expend public funds, grants, awards, or appropriations from the state,
from any agency, or authority of the state, from a city or county, or from any other special
purpose governmental entity.
(b) "Special purpose governmental entity" shall include entities meeting the requirements established by
paragraph (a) of this subsection, whether the entity is formed as a nonprofit corporation under KRS
Chapter 273, pursuant to an interlocal cooperation agreement under KRS 65.210 to 65.300, or pursuant
to any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.
(c) Examples of the types of public services that may be provided by special purpose governmental entities
include but are not limited to the following:
1. Ambulance, emergency, and fire protection services;
2. Flood control, drainage, levee, water, and water conservation services, and services provided by
watershed conservancy districts[,] and soil and water conservation districts[services];
3. Area planning, management, community improvement, and community development services;
4. Library services;
5. Public health, public mental health, and public hospital services;
6. Riverport and airport services;
7. Sanitation, sewer, waste management, and solid waste services;
8. Industrial and economic development;
9. Parks and recreation services;
10. Construction, maintenance, or operation of roads and bridges;
11. Mass transit services;
12. Pollution control;
13. Construction or provision of public housing, except as set out in paragraph (d)8. of this
subsection;
14. Tourism and convention services; and
15. Agricultural extension services.
(d) "Special purpose governmental entity" shall not include:
1. Cities;
2. Counties;
3. School districts;
4. Private entities;
5. Chambers of commerce;
6. Any incorporated entity that:
a. Provides utility services;
b. Is member-owned; and

CHAPTER 139 3
c. Has a governing body whose voting members are all elected by the membership of the
entity;
7. Any entity whose budget, finances, and financial information are fully integrated with and
included as a part of the budget, finances, and financial reporting of the city, county, or cities and
counties in which it operates;
8. Federally regulated public housing authorities established pursuant to KRS Chapter 80 that
receive no more than twenty percent (20%) of their total funding for any fiscal year from
nonfederal fees, not including rental income; or
9. a. Any fire protection district or volunteer fire department district operating under KRS
Chapter 75 with the higher of annual receipts from all sources or annual expenditures of
less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); or
b. Any fire department incorporated under KRS Chapter 273.
Section 2. KRS 262.097 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The supervisors of the respective soil and water conservation districts shall submit to the commission such
statements, estimates, budgets, and other information at such time and in such manner as the commission
requires.
(2) The supervisors of the soil and water conservation districts shall comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010
to 65A.090, except that KRS 65A.030 shall not apply to soil and water conservation districts.
Section 3. KRS 262.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all its proceedings and of all
resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted by it.
(2) Notwithstanding KRS 65A.030[For fiscal periods ending prior to July 1, 2014], an audit of the accounts of
each soil and water conservation district shall take place once every four (4) years unless the soil and water
conservation district receives or expends one million dollars ($1,000,000)[seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($750,000)] or more in any year, in which case the soil and water conservation district shall provide
for the performance of an annual audit. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with audit standards and
requirements stipulated in KRS 65.065(5).[ For fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2014, the
provisions of KRS 65A.030 shall apply to audits of the accounts of each district.]
(3) Upon request of the commission, the board shall furnish the commission with copies of ordinances,
regulations, orders, contracts, forms, and other documents adopted or employed by the board and any other
information requested by the commission concerning the board's activities.
Section 4. KRS 262.763 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [(a) ]Notwithstanding KRS 65A.030[For fiscal periods ending prior to July 1, 2014], an audit of the
accounts of each watershed conservancy district shall take place once every four (4) years unless the
watershed conservancy district receives or expends one million dollars ($1,000,000)[seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($750,000)] or more in any year, in which case the watershed conservancy district shall
provide for the performance of an annual audit. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with audit
standards and requirements stipulated in KRS 65.065(5). The board of directors of each watershed
conservancy district shall select to make the audit certified public accountants who have no personal interest in
the financial affairs of the board of directors or in any of its officers or employees.[
(b) For fiscal periods beginning on and after July 1, 2015, the provisions of KRS 65A.030 shall apply to the
audit of accounts of each watershed conservancy district.]
(2) Immediately upon completion of each audit, the accountant shall prepare a report of his or her findings and
recommendations. This report shall be to the board of directors and in such number of copies as specified by
the board of directors. The actual expense of any audit authorized under this section shall be borne by the
watershed conservancy district.
(3) The board of directors shall comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090, except that KRS
65A.030 shall not apply to watershed conservancy districts.
Section 5. KRS 262.910 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) During the term of an easement, the restricted land shall be used solely for the production of crops, livestock
and livestock products, and nursery and greenhouse products including the processing or retail marketing of
these crops, livestock and livestock products, and nursery and greenhouse products if more than fifty percent
(50%) of the processed or merchandised products are produced on the subject land, and for the raising and
stabling of horses for commercial purposes. For the purposes of this section and administrative regulations
promulgated under its provisions, "crops, livestock and livestock products, and nursery and greenhouse
products" include, but are not limited to:
(a) Tobacco;
(b) Wheat, soybeans, corn, and all commercially-produced fruits and vegetables;
(c) Horticultural specialties, including nursery stock ornamental shrubs, ornamental trees, and flowers;
(d) Livestock and livestock products, including cattle; sheep; swine; goats; horses; alpacas; llamas;
buffaloes; any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species; poultry;
milk; and eggs; and
(e) Aquatic plants and animals and their by-products.
(2) (a) During the term of an easement the landowner and the landowner's assigns, agents, or leasees shall not
perform, nor knowingly allow others to perform, any act on or affecting the restricted land that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section. The landowner shall be deemed to have authorized the
PACE board to enforce these provisions.
(b) Unless otherwise specified, the landowner shall not be required to take any action to restore the
condition of the restricted land after any act of God or other event over which the landowner had no
control.
(c) Nothing in the PACE Program shall relieve the landowner of any obligation or restriction on the use of
the property imposed by law.
(d) The Commonwealth shall not locate landfills, sewage treatment plants, or other public service facilities
that are not compatible with or complimentary to agricultural production on restricted lands.
(3) (a) To retain the agricultural viability of the restricted land, the PACE board shall require, and the owner of
the restricted land shall implement, a conservation plan approved by the soil and water conservation
district. This plan shall be updated every ten (10) years and any time the basic farming operation
conducted on restricted lands is changed. All farming operations shall be conducted substantially in
accordance with the plan.
(b) In addition to the requirements established by the soil and water conservation district, the conservation
plan shall require that:
1. The use of the land for growing sod, nursery stock, and ornamental trees and shrubs does not
remove excessive soil from the restricted land;
2. The excavation of soil, sand, gravel, stone, or other materials for use in agricultural production
on the restricted land is consistent with subsection (4)(h) of this section and is conducted in a
location and manner that retains the viability of the restricted land for agricultural production;
and
3. The mining of minerals is consistent with subsection (4)(h) of this section and is conducted only
through the use of methods which will not interfere with the viability of the restricted land for
agricultural production.
(4) The construction or reconstruction of any building or other structure, except those existing on the date of the
easement or previously approved by the PACE board, is prohibited except in accordance with this subsection.
(a) Existing fences may be repaired and replaced, and new fences may be built anywhere on the restricted
land for purposes of reasonable and customary management of livestock and wildlife, without approval
of the PACE board.
(b) New buildings and other structures and improvements to be used solely for agricultural purposes
including the processing or sale of farm products predominantly grown or raised on the restricted land,
but not including any dwelling or farm labor housing, may not be built on the restricted land without the
advance approval of the PACE board. The PACE board shall give approval within a reasonable time,

CHAPTER 139 5
unless it determines that the proposed building, structure, or improvement would not be properly
located or would significantly diminish the agricultural production capacity of the restricted land.
(c) All existing single-family residential dwellings may be repaired, reasonably enlarged, and replaced at
their current locations without further permission of the PACE board. No new single-family residential
dwellings may be built on the restricted land without the advance approval of the PACE board. The
PACE board shall give approval within a reasonable time, unless it determines that a proposed dwelling
would not be properly located or would significantly diminish the agricultural production capacity of
the restricted land.
(d) The subdivision of the restricted land, whether by physical or legal process, is prohibited without the
advance written approval of the PACE board. The PACE board shall give approval within a reasonable
time, unless it determines that the proposed subdivision will diminish or impair the agricultural
productivity of the restricted land.
(e) The granting of rights-of-way through restricted land for the installation of, transportation of, or use of,
lines for water, sewage, electric, telephone, gas, oil or oil products is permitted. The term "granting of
rights-of-way" includes the right to construct or install the lines. The construction or installation of
utility lines other than the types stated in this paragraph is prohibited on the restricted land.
(f) No portion of the restricted land shall be paved or otherwise be covered with concrete, asphalt, gravel,
or any other paving material, nor shall any road for access or other purposes be constructed, without the
advance written approval of the PACE board. The PACE board shall give approval within a reasonable
time, unless it determines that the proposed paving or covering of the soil, or the location of any road,
will substantially diminish or impair the agricultural productivity of the restricted land.
(g) Trees may be cut to control insects and disease, to prevent personal injury and property damage, and for
firewood and other domestic uses, including construction of permitted buildings and fences on the
restricted land. Trees may also be cut to clear land for cultivation or use of livestock, but only if done in
accordance with the conservation plan required by subsection (3) of this section. Any commercial
timber harvesting on the restricted land shall be conducted on a sustainable yield basis and in
substantial accordance with a forest management plan prepared by a competent professional forester.
(h) The mining or extraction of soil, sand, gravel, rock, oil, natural gas, fuel or any other mineral substance,
using any method that disturbs the surface of the land, is prohibited without the advance written
approval of the PACE board. The PACE board shall give approval within a reasonable time, unless it
determines that the proposed mining or extraction will substantially diminish or impair the agricultural
productivity of the restricted land.
(i) The dumping or accumulation of any kind of trash or refuse on the restricted land is prohibited.
However, this shall not prevent the storage of agricultural products and by-products on the restricted
land, so long as it is done in accordance with all applicable laws, administrative regulations, and
ordinances.
(j) Golf courses are prohibited on the restricted land. Buildings and facilities for any other public or private
recreational use may not be built on the restricted land without the advance written approval of the
PACE board. The PACE board shall not give approval unless it determines that the proposed use or
facilities will not substantially diminish or impair the agricultural productivity of the restricted land.
(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, upon a proper application, which
shall include supporting documentation from the appropriate federal agency, the PACE board may
give its written approval of a proposal to erect structures, roads, and pathways on the surface of the
restricted land as long as:
1. An underground training facility for federal agency personnel exists below the restricted land
surface;
2. Any such structures, roads, or pathways constructed will be used for the purpose of training
federal agency personnel; and
3. The applicant:
a. Signs an agreement with the PACE board requiring the applicant to:
i. Remove such structures, roads, or pathways; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
ii. Restore the land to its previous condition and to the satisfaction of the PACE
board on or before a date that is specified in the agreement;
b. Provides documentation of the county fiscal court's consent to the construction of the
proposed structures, roads, or pathways; and
c. Agrees in writing to all of the requirements for the exemption as established by the
PACE board.
(5) Landowners shall retain the right to perform any act not specifically prohibited or limited by this section and
administrative regulations promulgated under its provisions. These ownership rights include, but are not
limited to, the right to exclude any member of the public from trespassing on the restricted land and the right
to sell or otherwise transfer the restricted land to anyone of the landowner's choice.
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.